Mississippi, session 2026, HB1996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature finds that qualified opportunity zones represent areas of significant economic distress and that targeted, performance-based incentives can encourage private investment, job creation, and long-term economic stability.  The purpose of this section is to promote substantial capital investment and employment opportunities within qualified opportunity zones while ensuring accountability and measurable public benefit. (2)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "MDA" means the Mississippi Development Authority. (b)  "Qualified opportunity zone" means and has the same definition as such term has in 26 USC Section 1400Z-1. (3)  There is established the Mississippi Qualified Opportunity Zone Investment Incentive Program, to be administered by the MDA in coordination with the Mississippi Department of Revenue and local governing authorities. (4)  To qualify for incentives under this section, a business must: (a)  Locate or expand operations within a qualified opportunity zone located in the State of Mississippi; (b)  Make a minimum capital investment of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) in qualified property, facilities, or equipment located within the qualified opportunity zone; (c)  Create not fewer than thirty (30) new full-time jobs within the qualified opportunity zone; (d)  Ensure that at least sixty percent (60%) of new full-time employees are residents of the municipality in which the qualified opportunity zone is located; and (e)  Commit to maintaining operations within the qualified opportunity zone for a minimum period of seven (7) years from the date of certification. (5)  Upon certification by the MDA and satisfaction of eligibility requirements, an approved business may receive the following incentives: (a)  Ad valorem tax exemption of up to one hundred percent (100%) on eligible real and personal property, within a qualified opportunity zone and which used in the business's operations within the qualified opportunity zone, for a period not to exceed ten (10) years, subject to approval by the applicable local governing authorities; (b)  Income tax exemption of up to one hundred percent (100%) of Mississippi income tax liability attributable to operations within the qualified opportunity zone for a period not to exceed ten (10) years; and (c)  Sales tax exemption on the purchase of capital equipment, machinery, and related materials used directly in the business's operations within the qualified opportunity zone. (6)  Ad valorem tax exemptions authorized under this section require approval by the applicable municipality, county, or other local governing authority in order to take effect.  Nothing in this section shall require a local governing authority to grant an ad valorem tax exemption. (7)  Each business receiving incentives under this section shall: (a)  Annually certify compliance with investment, employment, and residency requirements; (b)  Provide documentation as required by the MDA and the Department of Revenue; and (c)  Submit to audit or review by the Office of the State Auditor as necessary to ensure compliance. (8)  (a)  Incentives granted under this section shall terminate immediately if a business fails to: (i)  Maintain the required level of capital investment; (ii) Maintain the minimum number of full-time jobs; or (iii) Comply with residency or operational requirements. (b)  The MDA, in coordination with the Department of Revenue, may provide for recapture or repayment of incentives received if noncompliance is determined, consistent with rules adopted pursuant to this section. (9)  The MDA may promulgate rules, guidelines, and procedures necessary to administer this program, including application processes, certification standards, compliance monitoring, and enforcement provisions. (10)  This section shall be construed to promote economic development while safeguarding public funds through performance-based incentives and accountability measures. SECTION 2.  Section 27-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-7-21.  (a)  Allowance of deductions.  In the case of a resident individual, the exemptions provided by this section, as applicable to individuals, shall be allowed as deductions in computing taxable income. (b)  Single individuals. In the case of a single individual, a personal exemption of Five Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($5,250.00) for the 1979 and 1980 calendar years and Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) for each calendar year thereafter. (c)  Married individuals. In the case of married individuals living together, a joint personal exemption of Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00) for the 1979 and 1980 calendar years and Nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($9,500.00) for the 1981 through 1997 calendar years, Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the calendar year 1998, Eleven Thousand Dollars ($11,000.00) for the calendar year 1999, and Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) for each calendar year thereafter.  A husband and wife living together shall receive but one (1) personal exemption in the amounts provided for in this subsection for each calendar year against their aggregate income. (d)  Head of family individuals. In the case of a head of family individual, a personal exemption of Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00) for the 1979 and 1980 calendar years and Nine Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($9,500.00) for each calendar year thereafter. The term "head of family" means an individual who is single, or married but not living with his spouse for the entire taxable year, who maintains a household which constitutes the principal place of abode of himself and one or more individuals who are dependents under the provisions of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.  The head of family individual shall be entitled to the additional dependent exemption as provided in subsection (e) of this section only to the extent of dependents in excess of the one (1) dependent needed to qualify as head of family. (e)  Additional exemption for dependents.  In the case of any individual having a dependent, other than husband or wife, an additional personal exemption of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for each such dependent, except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section.  The term "dependent" as used in this subsection shall mean any person or individual who qualifies as a dependent under the provisions of Section 152, Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended. (f)  Additional exemption for taxpayer or spouse aged sixty-five (65) or more.  In the case of any taxpayer or the spouse of the taxpayer who has attained the age of sixty-five (65) before the close of his taxable year, an additional exemption of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00). (g)  Additional exemption for blindness of taxpayer or spouse.  In the case of any taxpayer or the spouse of the taxpayer who is blind at the close of the taxable year, an additional exemption of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00).  For the purpose of this subsection, an individual is blind only if his central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses, or if his visual acuity is greater than 20/200 but is accompanied by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty (20) degrees. (h)  Husband and wife--claiming exemptions.  In the case of husband and wife living together and filing combined returns, the personal and additional exemptions authorized and allowed by this section may be taken by either, or divided between them in any manner they may choose.  If the husband and wife fail to choose, the commissioner shall divide the exemptions between husband and wife in an equitable manner. In the case of a husband and wife filing separate returns, the personal and additional exemptions authorized and allowed by this section shall be divided equally between the spouses. (i)  Nonresidents.  A nonresident individual shall be allowed the same personal and additional exemptions as are authorized for resident individuals in subsection (a) of this section; however, the nonresident individual is entitled only to that proportion of the personal and additional exemptions as his net income from sources within the State of Mississippi bears to his total or entire net income from all sources. A nonresident individual who is married and whose spouse has income from independent sources must declare the joint income of himself and his spouse from sources within and without Mississippi and claim as a personal exemption that proportion of the authorized personal and additional exemptions which the total net income from Mississippi sources bears to the total net income of both spouses from all sources.  If both spouses have income from sources within Mississippi and wish to file separate returns, their combined personal and additional exemptions shall be that proration of the exemption which their combined net income from Mississippi sources is of their total combined net income from all sources. The amount of the personal and additional exemptions so computed may be divided between them in any manner they choose. In the case of married individuals where one (1) spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident, the personal exemption of the resident individual shall be prorated on the same basis as if both were nonresidents having net income from within and without the State of Mississippi. For the purpose of this subsection, the term "net income" means gross income less business expenses incurred in the taxpayer's regular trade or business and computed in accordance with the provisions of the Mississippi Income Tax Law. (j)  Part-year residents. An individual who is a resident of Mississippi for only a part of his taxable year by reason of either moving into the state or moving from the state shall be allowed the same personal and additional exemptions as authorized for resident individuals in subsection (a) of this section; the part-year resident shall prorate his exemption on the same basis as nonresidents having net income from within and without the state. (k)  Estates.  In the case of an estate, a specific exemption of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00). (l)  Trusts.  In the case of a trust which, under its governing instrument, is required to distribute all of its income currently, a specific exemption of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00).  In the case of all other trusts, a specific exemption of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (m)  Corporations, foundations, joint ventures, associations.  In the case of a corporation, foundation, joint venture or association taxable herein, there shall be allowed no specific exemption, except as provided under the Growth and Prosperity Act, Sections 57-113-1 through 57-113-7, and Sections 57-113-21 through 57-113-27. (n)  Status.  The status on the last day of the taxable year, except in the case of the head of family as provided in subsection (d) of this section, shall determine the right to the exemptions provided in this section; provided, that a taxpayer shall be entitled to such exemptions, otherwise allowable, if the husband or wife or dependent has died during the taxable year. (o)  Fiscal-year taxpayers.  Individual taxpayers reporting on a fiscal year basis shall prorate their exemptions in a manner established by regulations promulgated by the commissioner. SECTION 3.  Section 27-65-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-65-101.  (1)  The exemptions from the provisions of this chapter which are of an industrial nature or which are more properly classified as industrial exemptions than any other exemption classification of this chapter shall be confined to those persons or property exempted by this section or by the provisions of the Constitution of the United States or the State of Mississippi.  No industrial exemption as now provided by any other section except Section 57-3-33 shall be valid as against the tax herein levied.  Any subsequent industrial exemption from the tax levied hereunder shall be provided by amendment to this section. No exemption provided in this section shall apply to taxes levied by Section 27-65-15 or 27-65-21. The tax levied by this chapter shall not apply to the following: (a)  Sales of boxes, crates, cartons, cans, bottles and other packaging materials to manufacturers and wholesalers for use as containers or shipping materials to accompany goods sold by said manufacturers or wholesalers where possession thereof will pass to the customer at the time of sale of the goods contained therein and sales to anyone of containers or shipping materials for use in ships engaged in international commerce. (b)  Sales of raw materials, catalysts, processing chemicals, welding gases or other industrial processing gases (except natural gas) to a manufacturer for use directly in manufacturing or processing a product for sale or rental or repairing or reconditioning vessels or barges of fifty (50) tons load displacement and over.  For the purposes of this exemption, electricity used directly in the electrolysis process in the production of sodium chlorate shall be considered a raw material.  This exemption shall not apply to any property used as fuel except to the extent that such fuel comprises by-products which have no market value. (c)  The gross proceeds of sales of dry docks, offshore drilling equipment for use in oil or natural gas exploration or production, vessels or barges of fifty (50) tons load displacement and over, when the vessels or barges are sold by the manufacturer or builder thereof.  In addition to other types of equipment, offshore drilling equipment for use in oil or natural gas exploration or production shall include aircraft used predominately to transport passengers or property to or from offshore oil or natural gas exploration or production platforms or vessels, and engines, accessories and spare parts for such aircraft. (d)  Sales to commercial fishermen of commercial fishing boats of over five (5) tons load displacement and not more than fifty (50) tons load displacement as registered with the United States Coast Guard and licensed by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources. (e)  The gross income from repairs to vessels and barges engaged in foreign trade or interstate transportation. (f)  Sales of petroleum products to vessels or barges for consumption in marine international commerce or interstate transportation businesses. (g)  Sales and rentals of rail rolling stock (and component parts thereof) for ultimate use in interstate commerce and gross income from services with respect to manufacturing, repairing, cleaning, altering, reconditioning or improving such rail rolling stock (and component parts thereof). (h)  Sales of raw materials, catalysts, processing chemicals, welding gases or other industrial processing gases (except natural gas) used or consumed directly in manufacturing, repairing, cleaning, altering, reconditioning or improving such rail rolling stock (and component parts thereof).  This exemption shall not apply to any property used as fuel. (i)  Sales of machinery or tools or repair parts therefor or replacements thereof, fuel or supplies used directly in manufacturing, converting or repairing ships, vessels or barges of three thousand (3,000) tons load displacement and over, but not to include office and plant supplies or other equipment not directly used on the ship, vessel or barge being built, converted or repaired.  For purposes of this exemption, "ships, vessels or barges" shall not include floating structures described in Section 27-65-18. (j)  Sales of tangible personal property to persons operating ships in international commerce for use or consumption on board such ships.  This exemption shall be limited to cases in which procedures satisfactory to the commissioner, ensuring against use in this state other than on such ships, are established. (k)  Sales of materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the building, or any addition thereon, to be used therein, to qualified businesses, as defined in Section 57-51-5, which are located in a county or portion thereof designated as an enterprise zone pursuant to Sections 57-51-1 through 57-51-15. (l)  Sales of materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the building, or any addition thereon, to be used therein, to qualified businesses, as defined in Section 57-54-5. (m)  Income from storage and handling of perishable goods by a public storage warehouse. (n)  The value of natural gas lawfully injected into the earth for cycling, repressuring or lifting of oil, or lawfully vented or flared in connection with the production of oil; however, if any gas so injected into the earth is sold for such purposes, then the gas so sold shall not be exempt. (o)  The gross collections from self-service commercial laundering, drying, cleaning and pressing equipment. (p)  Sales of materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the building, or any addition thereon, to be used therein, to qualified companies, certified as such by the Mississippi Development Authority under Section 57-53-1. (q)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, sales of machinery and equipment to be used therein, and sales of manufacturing or processing machinery and equipment which is permanently attached to the ground or to a permanent foundation and which is not by its nature intended to be housed within a building structure, not later than three (3) months after the initial start-up date, to permanent business enterprises engaging in manufacturing or processing in Tier Three areas (as such term is defined in Section 57-73-21), which businesses are certified by the Department of Revenue as being eligible for the exemption granted in this paragraph (q).  The exemption provided in this paragraph (q) shall not apply to sales to any business enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act. (r)  (i)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of the building, addition or improvement thereon, to be used therein, for any company establishing or transferring its national or regional headquarters from within or outside the State of Mississippi and creating a minimum of twenty (20) jobs at the new headquarters in this state.  The exemption provided in this subparagraph (i) shall not apply to sales for any company that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  The Department of Revenue shall establish criteria and prescribe procedures to determine if a company qualifies as a national or regional headquarters for the purpose of receiving the exemption provided in this subparagraph (i). (ii)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of the building, addition or improvement thereon, to be used therein, for any company expanding or making additions after January 1, 2013, to its national or regional headquarters within the State of Mississippi and creating a minimum of twenty (20) new jobs at the headquarters as a result of the expansion or additions.  The exemption provided in this subparagraph (ii) shall not apply to sales for any company that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  The Department of Revenue shall establish criteria and prescribe procedures to determine if a company qualifies as a national or regional headquarters for the purpose of receiving the exemption provided in this subparagraph (ii). (s)  The gross proceeds from the sale of semitrailers, trailers, boats, travel trailers, motorcycles, all-terrain cycles and rotary-wing aircraft if exported from this state within forty-eight (48) hours and registered and first used in another state. (t)  Gross income from the storage and handling of natural gas in underground salt domes and in other underground reservoirs, caverns, structures and formations suitable for such storage. (u)  Sales of machinery and equipment to nonprofit organizations if the organization: (i)  Is tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (ii)  Assists in the implementation of the contingency plan or area contingency plan, and which is created in response to the requirements of Title IV, Subtitle B of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Public Law 101-380; and (iii)  Engages primarily in programs to contain, clean up and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring in the United States coastal and tidal waters. For purposes of this exemption, "machinery and equipment" means any ocean-going vessels, barges, booms, skimmers and other capital equipment used primarily in the operations of nonprofit organizations referred to herein. (v)  Sales or leases of materials and equipment to approved business enterprises as provided under the Growth and Prosperity Act. (w)  From and after July 1, 2001, sales of pollution control equipment to manufacturers or custom processors for industrial use.  For the purposes of this exemption, "pollution control equipment" means equipment, devices, machinery or systems used or acquired to prevent, control, monitor or reduce air, water or groundwater pollution, or solid or hazardous waste as required by federal or state law or regulation. (x)  Sales or leases to a manufacturer of motor vehicles or powertrain components operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) of machinery and equipment; special tooling such as dies, molds, jigs and similar items treated as special tooling for federal income tax purposes; or repair parts therefor or replacements thereof; repair services thereon; fuel, supplies, electricity, coal and natural gas used directly in the manufacture of motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts or used to provide climate control for manufacturing areas. (y)  Sales or leases of component materials, machinery and equipment used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) and any other sales or leases required to establish or operate such project. (z)  Sales of component materials and equipment to a business enterprise as provided under Section 57-64-33. (aa)  The gross income from the stripping and painting of commercial aircraft engaged in foreign or interstate transportation business. (bb)  [Repealed] (cc)  Sales or leases to an enterprise owning or operating a project that has been designated by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) of machinery and equipment; special tooling such as dies, molds, jigs and similar items treated as special tooling for federal income tax purposes; or repair parts therefor or replacements thereof; repair services thereon; fuel, supplies, electricity, coal and natural gas used directly in the manufacturing/production operations of the project or used to provide climate control for manufacturing/production areas. (dd)  Sales or leases of component materials, machinery and equipment used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon to an enterprise owning or operating a project that has been designated by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) and any other sales or leases required to establish or operate such project. (ee)  Sales of parts used in the repair and servicing of aircraft not registered in Mississippi engaged exclusively in the business of foreign or interstate transportation to businesses engaged in aircraft repair and maintenance. (ff)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a facility, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales or leases of machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, to be used in the building or any addition or improvement thereto, to a permanent business enterprise operating a data/information enterprise in Tier Three areas (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), meeting minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority.  The exemption provided in this paragraph (ff) shall not apply to sales to any business enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act. (gg)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, and sales of machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, to be used in the facility or any addition or improvement thereto, to technology intensive enterprises for industrial purposes in Tier Three areas (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), as certified by the Department of Revenue.  For purposes of this paragraph, an enterprise must meet the criteria provided for in Section 27-65-17(1)(f) in order to be considered a technology intensive enterprise. (hh)  Sales of component materials used in the replacement, reconstruction or repair of a building or facility that has been destroyed or sustained extensive damage as a result of a disaster declared by the Governor, sales of machinery and equipment to be used therein to replace machinery or equipment damaged or destroyed as a result of such disaster, including, but not limited to, manufacturing or processing machinery and equipment which is permanently attached to the ground or to a permanent foundation and which is not by its nature intended to be housed within a building structure, to enterprises or companies that were eligible for the exemptions authorized in paragraph (q), (r), (ff) or (gg) of this subsection during initial construction of the building that was destroyed or damaged, which enterprises or companies are certified by the Department of Revenue as being eligible for the exemption granted in this paragraph. (ii)  Sales of software or software services transmitted by the Internet to a destination outside the State of Mississippi where the first use of such software or software services by the purchaser occurs outside the State of Mississippi. (jj)  Gross income of public storage warehouses derived from the temporary storage of raw materials that are to be used in an eligible facility as defined in Section 27-7-22.35. (kk)  Sales of component building materials and equipment for initial construction of facilities or expansion of facilities as authorized under Sections 57-113-1 through 57-113-7 and Sections 57-113-21 through 57-113-27. (ll)  Sales and leases of machinery and equipment acquired in the initial construction to establish facilities as authorized in Sections 57-113-1 through 57-113-7. (mm)  Sales and leases of replacement hardware, software or other necessary technology to operate a data center as authorized under Sections 57-113-21 through 57-113-27. (nn)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales or leases of machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of the construction of the facility, to be used in the facility, to permanent business enterprises operating a facility producing renewable crude oil from biomass harvested or produced, in whole or in part, in Mississippi, which businesses meet minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority.  As used in this paragraph, the term "biomass" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-113-1. (oo)  Sales of supplies, equipment and other personal property to an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is the host organization coordinating a professional golf tournament played or to be played in this state and the supplies, equipment or other personal property will be used for purposes related to the golf tournament and related activities. (pp)  Sales of materials used in the construction of a health care industry facility, as defined in Section 57-117-3, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales of any machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the facility, or any addition thereon, to be used therein, to qualified businesses, as defined in Section 57-117-3.  This paragraph shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2026. (qq)  Sales or leases to a manufacturer of automotive parts operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) of machinery and equipment; or repair parts therefor or replacements thereof; repair services thereon; fuel, supplies, electricity, coal, nitrogen and natural gas used directly in the manufacture of automotive parts or used to provide climate control for manufacturing areas. (rr)  Gross collections derived from guided tours on any navigable waters of this state, which include providing accommodations, guide services and/or related equipment operated by or under the direction of the person providing the tour, for the purposes of outdoor tourism.  The exemption provided in this paragraph (rr) does not apply to the sale of tangible personal property by a person providing such tours. (ss)  Retail sales of truck-tractors and semitrailers used in interstate commerce and registered under the International Registration Plan (IRP) or any similar reciprocity agreement or compact relating to the proportional registration of commercial vehicles entered into as provided for in Section 27-19-143. (tt)  Sales exempt under the Facilitating Business Rapid Response to State Declared Disasters Act of 2015 (Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9). (uu)  Sales or leases to an enterprise and its affiliates operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) of: (i)  All personal property and fixtures, including without limitation, sales or leases to the enterprise and its affiliates of: 1. Manufacturing machinery and equipment; 2.  Special tooling such as dies, molds, jigs and similar items treated as special tooling for federal income tax purposes; 3.  Component building materials, machinery and equipment used in the construction of buildings, and any other additions or improvements to the project site for the project; 4. Nonmanufacturing furniture, fixtures and equipment (inclusive of all communications, computer, server, software and other hardware equipment); and 5.  Fuel, supplies (other than nonmanufacturing consumable supplies and water), electricity, nitrogen gas and natural gas used directly in the manufacturing/production operations of such project or used to provide climate control for manufacturing/production areas of such project; (ii)  All replacements of, repair parts for or services to repair items described in subparagraph (i)1, 2 and 3 of this paragraph; and (iii)  All services taxable pursuant to Section 27-65-23 required to establish, support, operate, repair and/or maintain such project. (vv)  Sales or leases to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) of: (i)  Purchases required to establish and operate the project, including, but not limited to, sales of component building materials, machinery and equipment required to establish the project facility and any additions or improvements thereon; and (ii)  Machinery, special tools (such as dies, molds, and jigs) or repair parts thereof, or replacements and lease thereof, repair services thereon, fuel, supplies and electricity, coal and natural gas used in the manufacturing process and purchased by the enterprise owning or operating the project for the benefit of the project. (ww)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any expansion or improvement thereon, sales of machinery and/or equipment to be used therein, and sales of processing machinery and equipment which is permanently attached to the ground or to a permanent foundation which is not by its nature intended to be housed in a building structure, no later than three (3) months after initial startup, expansion or improvement of a permanent enterprise solely engaged in the conversion of natural sand into proppants used in oil and gas exploration and development with at least ninety-five percent (95%) of such proppants used in the production of oil and/or gas from horizontally drilled wells and/or horizontally drilled recompletion wells as defined in Sections 27-25-501 and 27-25-701. (xx)  (i)  Sales or leases to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), for a period ending no later than one (1) year following completion of the construction of the facility or facilities comprising such project of all personal property and fixtures, including without limitation, sales or leases to the enterprise and its affiliates of: 1. Manufacturing machinery and equipment; 2.  Special tooling such as dies, molds, jigs and similar items treated as special tooling for federal income tax purposes; 3.  Component building materials, machinery and equipment used in the construction of buildings, and any other additions or improvements to the project site for the project; 4. Nonmanufacturing furniture, fixtures and equipment (inclusive of all communications, computer, server, software and other hardware equipment); 5. Replacements of, repair parts for or services to repair items described in this subparagraph (i)1, 2 and 3; and 6.  All services taxable pursuant to Section 27-65-23 required to establish, support, operate, repair and/or maintain such project; and (ii)  Sales or leases to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi) of electricity, current, power, steam, coal, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel, biomass, nitrogen or other atmospheric or other industrial gases used directly by the enterprise in the manufacturing/production operations of its project or used to provide climate control for manufacturing/production areas (which manufacturing/production areas shall be apportioned based on square footage).  As used in this paragraph, the term "biomass" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-113-1. (yy)  The gross proceeds from the sale of any item of tangible personal property by the manufacturer or custom processor thereof if such item is shipped, transported or exported from this state and first used in another state, whether such shipment, transportation or exportation is made by the seller, purchaser, or any third party acting on behalf of such party.  For the purposes of this paragraph (yy), any instruction to, training of or inspection by the purchaser with respect to the item prior to shipment, transportation or exportation of the item shall not constitute a first use of such item within this state. (zz)  (i)  Sales or leases to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii), for a period ending no later than one (1) year following completion of the construction of the facility or facilities comprising such project of all personal property and fixtures, including, without limitation, sales or leases to the enterprise and its affiliates of: 1. Manufacturing machinery and equipment; 2.  Special tooling such as dies, molds, jigs and similar items treated as special tooling for federal income tax purposes; 3.  Component building materials, machinery and equipment used in the construction of buildings, and any other additions or improvements to the project site for the project; 4. Nonmanufacturing furniture, fixtures and equipment (inclusive of all communications, computer, server, software and other hardware equipment); 5. Replacements of, repair parts for or services to repair items described in this subparagraph (i)1, 2 and 3; and 6.  All services taxable pursuant to Section 27-65-23 required to establish, support, operate, repair and/or maintain such project; and (ii)  Sales or leases to an enterprise operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) of electricity, current, power, steam, coal, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel, biomass, nitrogen or other atmospheric or other industrial gases used directly by the enterprise in the manufacturing/production operations of its project or used to provide climate control for manufacturing/production areas (which manufacturing/production areas shall be apportioned based on square footage).  As used in this paragraph, the term "biomass" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-113-1. (aaa)  Sales or leases to an enterprise and/or any affiliates thereof operating a project that has been certified by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) of: (i)  Component building materials, fixtures, machinery and equipment used in the construction of a data processing facility or other buildings comprising all or part of a project, for a period ending no later than one (1) year following completion of the construction of the data processing facility or such other building; and (ii)  All equipment and other personal property needed to establish and operate the project and any expansions thereof or additions thereto, including, but not limited to: 1. Communications, computer, server, software, connectivity materials and equipment, emergency power generation equipment, other hardware equipment and any other technology; 2.  All replacements of, and repair parts for, such equipment or other personal property; and 3.  All services taxable pursuant to Section 27-65-23 required to install, support, operate, repair and/or maintain the foregoing equipment and other personal property described in this subparagraph (ii). (bbb)  Sales, leases or other retail transfers of fixed-wing aircraft to, or to be used by, certified common carriers in the transport of persons or property in interstate, intrastate or foreign commerce, and engines, accessories and spare parts for such fixed-wing aircraft. (2)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a building, or any addition or improvement thereon, sales of machinery and equipment to be used therein, and sales of manufacturing or processing machinery and equipment which is permanently attached to the ground or to a permanent foundation and which is not by its nature intended to be housed within a building structure, not later than three (3) months after the initial start-up date, to permanent business enterprises engaging in manufacturing or processing in Tier Two areas and Tier One areas (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), which businesses are certified by the Department of Revenue as being eligible for the exemption granted in this subsection, shall be exempt from one-half (1/2) of the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter.  The exemption provided in this subsection (2) shall not apply to sales to any business enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act. (3)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a facility, or any addition or improvement thereon, and sales or leases of machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, to be used in the building or any addition or improvement thereto, to a permanent business enterprise operating a data/information enterprise in Tier Two areas and Tier One areas (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), which businesses meet minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority, shall be exempt from one-half (1/2) of the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter.  The exemption provided in this subsection (3) shall not apply to sales to any business enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act. (4)  Sales of component materials used in the construction of a facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, and sales of machinery and equipment not later than three (3) months after the completion of construction of the facility, or any addition or improvement thereto, to be used in the building or any addition or improvement thereto, to technology intensive enterprises for industrial purposes in Tier Two areas and Tier One areas (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), which businesses are certified by the Department of Revenue as being eligible for the exemption granted in this subsection, shall be exempt from one-half (1/2) of the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter.  For purposes of this subsection, an enterprise must meet the criteria provided for in Section 27-65-17(1)(f) in order to be considered a technology intensive enterprise. (5)  (a)  For purposes of this subsection: (i)  "Telecommunications enterprises" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-73-21; (ii)  "Tier One areas" mean counties designated as Tier One areas pursuant to Section 57-73-21; (iii)  "Tier Two areas" mean counties designated as Tier Two areas pursuant to Section 57-73-21; (iv)  "Tier Three areas" mean counties designated as Tier Three areas pursuant to Section 57-73-21; and (v)  "Equipment used in the deployment of broadband technologies" means any equipment capable of being used for or in connection with the transmission of information at a rate, prior to taking into account the effects of any signal degradation, that is not less than thirty-five (35) megabits per second downlink and three (3) megabits per second uplink for mobile broadband or that is capable of providing fixed broadband service as defined by Section 77-19-3. (b)  Sales of equipment to telecommunications enterprises after June 30, 2003, and before July 1, 2030, that is installed in Tier One areas and used in the deployment of broadband technologies shall be exempt from one-half (1/2) of the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter. (c)  Sales of equipment to telecommunications enterprises after June 30, 2003, and before July 1, 2030, that is installed in Tier Two and Tier Three areas and used in the deployment of broadband technologies shall be exempt from the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter. (6)  Sales of component materials used in the replacement, reconstruction or repair of a building that has been destroyed or sustained extensive damage as a result of a disaster declared by the Governor, sales of machinery and equipment to be used therein to replace machinery or equipment damaged or destroyed as a result of such disaster, including, but not limited to, manufacturing or processing machinery and equipment which is permanently attached to the ground or to a permanent foundation and which is not by its nature intended to be housed within a building structure, to enterprises that were eligible for the partial exemptions provided for in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section during initial construction of the building that was destroyed or damaged, which enterprises are certified by the Department of Revenue as being eligible for the partial exemption granted in this subsection, shall be exempt from one-half (1/2) of the taxes imposed on such transactions under this chapter. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.